Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-405 Association; powers, process;
examination. Any association formed for the purposes of this part may hold
title to property, may enter into contracts, and may limit the liability of its
members to their respective pro rata shares of the liability of such
association. Any such association may sue and be sued in its associate name
and for such purpose only shall be treated as a domestic corporation. Service
of process against the association, made upon a managing agent, any of its
members or any agent authorized by appointment to receive service of process,
shall have the same force and effect as if the service had been made upon all
members of the association. The association's books and records shall also be
subject to examination under the provisions of article 2, either separately or
concurrently with examination of any of its member insurers. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next